Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-84-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971.”

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3901.

Cross-References. Alternative method of establishing and governing district, §7-84-506.

7-84-102. Purpose.

It is hereby determined and declared that the deterioration of the central business districts of some cities and towns of the state by reason of dilapidation, obsolescence, overcrowding, faulty arrangement or design, deleterious land use, obsolete layout, or any combination of these or other factors, is a threat to the property tax and other revenue sources of such municipalities and is detrimental to the safety, health, morals, and general and economic welfare of the communities in which they are located; that the elimination of urban blight and decay and the modernization and general improvement of such central business districts by governmental action is considered necessary to promote the public health, safety and welfare of such communities; and that restoration of such central business districts is an appropriate subject for remedial legislation.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3902.

Collateral References.

What constitutes “blighted area” within urban renewal and redevelopment statutes. 45 A.L.R.3d 1096.

7-84-103. Definitions — Parts 1-4.

As used in parts 1-4 of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assessed value” means value as assessed for municipal property tax purposes;

“Board” means the board of assessment commissioners;

“District” means the central business district created by ordinance or resolution by a municipality, or a corridor of central business districts created by joint agreement of two (2) or more municipalities;

“Governing body” means the council or commission or other municipal body exercising general legislative power in the municipality or any county legislative body;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city, town, metropolitan government, or county of this state exercising general governmental functions in the state;

“Owner” means record owner in fee; and

“Plan” or “plan of improvement” means the detailed design plan of all proposed improvements in the district, including all such engineering studies, blueprints, architects' renderings, photographs, diagrams, maps, schematics, specifications, and drawings as may be required or desired to fully effectuate the construction of improvements and the purchase of equipment or other items.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 3; 1977, ch. 154, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3903; Acts 1990, ch. 808, § 1; 2003, ch. 196, § 1.

7-84-104. Housing authority proceedings not affected — District may be part of urban renewal area.

This chapter shall not affect any proceedings under title 13, chapter 20, parts 1-3, and all or any part of the area within the boundaries of a central business improvement district may be part of any urban renewal area created pursuant to such provisions or other laws.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 39; T.C.A., § 6-3939.

7-84-105. Supplemental nature of provisions — Scope of authority — Amendments.

Parts 1-4 of this chapter are intended to afford an alternative method for the making or acquisition of improvements by a municipality, the creation of special improvement districts for central business districts of the various municipalities, the levy of assessments and the issuance of bonds by municipalities, and shall not be so construed as to deprive any municipality of the right to make or acquire improvements, create special improvement districts, levy the assessments or other special taxes or issue bonds under authority of any other law of this state now in effect or hereafter enacted, including part 5 of this chapter. Nevertheless, parts 1-4 of this chapter shall constitute full authority for the making or acquisition of improvements, creation of central business improvement districts, levy of assessments and issuance of bonds under title 9, chapter 21, to the extent applicable, by such municipalities as act under parts 1-4 of this chapter.

No act hereafter passed by the general assembly amending other acts relating to the same subject matter as covered by parts 1-4 of this chapter shall be construed to affect the authority to proceed under parts 1-4 of this chapter in the manner provided in parts 1-4 of this chapter, unless such future act amends parts 1-4 of this chapter and specifically provides that it is to be applicable to proceedings taken and to bonds issued under parts 1-4 of this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 40; T.C.A., § 6-3940; Acts 1990, ch. 808, § 2; 2007, ch. 494, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-106. Control and jurisdiction over property.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect or impair the control and jurisdiction that a municipality has over all property within its boundaries. The powers and authority granted by this chapter shall be in addition to any and all other powers and authority now residing with, or hereafter granted to, municipalities in the state, and all powers granted in this chapter shall be subject to the general control and jurisdiction of such municipalities.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 41; T.C.A., § 6-3941.

7-84-107. Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 42; T.C.A., § 6-3942.

7-84-108. Effect of other laws.

In the event of conflict between this chapter and any other laws or parts of laws governing the statutes of Tennessee, this chapter shall govern.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 43; T.C.A., § 6-3943.